Utah statutes.
11-30-9.   Failure of validity based on substantial defects or material errors and omissions.

No court may fail to declare bonds valid under this chapter unless the court finds substantial defects or material errors and omissions in the issuance of the bonds.  Matters of form shall be disregarded.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 1987 General Session

